fi_FI.aff
SFX W   0     llanikin    va
SFX W   0     llanikaan   va
SFX W   0     llaniko     va
SFX W   0     llanipa     va
SFX W   0     llanihan    va
SFX W   0     llanikinko  va
SFX W   0     llanikaanko va
SFX W   0     llanikohan  va
SFX W   0     llanipahan  va
SFX W   0     llasikin    va
SFX W   0     llasikaan   va
SFX W   0     llasiko     va
SFX W   0     llasipa     va
SFX W   0     llasihan    va
SFX W   0     llasikinko  va
SFX W   0     llasikaanko va
SFX W   0     llasikohan  va
SFX W   0     llasipahan  va
SFX W   0     llansakin   va
SFX W   0     llansakaan  va
SFX W   0     llansako    va
SFX W   0     llansapa    va
SFX W   0     llansahan   va
SFX W   0     llansakinko va
SFX W   0     llansakaanko va
SFX W   0     llansakohan va
SFX W   0     llansapahan va
SFX W   0     llammekin   va
SFX W   0     llammekaan  va
SFX W   0     llammeko    va
SFX W   0     llammepa    va
SFX W   0     llammehan   va
SFX W   0     llammekinko va
SFX W   0     llammekaanko va
SFX W   0     llammekohan va
SFX W   0     llammepahan va
SFX W   0     llannekin   va
SFX W   0     llannekaan  va
SFX W   0     llanneko    va
SFX W   0     llannepa    va
SFX W   0     llannehan   va
SFX W   0     llannekinko va
SFX W   0     llannekaanko va
SFX W   0     llannekohan va
SFX W   0     llannepahan va
SFX W   0     ltanikin    va
SFX W   0     ltanikaan   va
SFX W   0     ltaniko     va
SFX W   0     ltanipa     va
SFX W   0     ltanihan    va
SFX W   0     ltanikinko  va
SFX W   0     ltanikaanko va
SFX W   0     ltanikohan  va
SFX W   0     ltanipahan  va
SFX W   0     ltasikin    va
SFX W   0     ltasikaan   va
SFX W   0     ltasiko     va
SFX W   0     ltasipa     va
SFX W   0     ltasihan    va
SFX W   0     ltasikinko  va
SFX W   0     ltasikaanko va
SFX W   0     ltasikohan  va
SFX W   0     ltasipahan  va
SFX W   0     ltansakin   va
SFX W   0     ltansakaan  va
SFX W   0     ltansako    va
SFX W   0     ltansapa    va
SFX W   0     ltansahan   va
SFX W   0     ltansakinko va
SFX W   0     ltansakaanko va
SFX W   0     ltansakohan va
SFX W   0     ltansapahan va
SFX W   0     ltammekin   va
SFX W   0     ltammekaan  va
SFX W   0     ltammeko    va
SFX W   0     ltammepa    va
SFX W   0     ltammehan   va
SFX W   0     ltammekinko va
SFX W   0     ltammekaanko va
SFX W   0     ltammekohan va
SFX W   0     ltammepahan va
SFX W   0     ltannekin   va
SFX W   0     ltannekaan  va
SFX W   0     ltanneko    va
SFX W   0     ltannepa    va
SFX W   0     ltannehan   va
SFX W   0     ltannekinko va
SFX W   0     ltannekaanko va
SFX W   0     ltannekohan va
SFX W   0     ltannepahan va
SFX W   0     llenikin    va
SFX W   0     llenikaan   va
SFX W   0     lleniko     va
SFX W   0     llenipa     va
SFX W   0     llenihan    va
SFX W   0     llenikinko  va
SFX W   0     llenikaanko va
SFX W   0     llenikohan  va
SFX W   0     llenipahan  va
SFX W   0     llesikin    va
SFX W   0     llesikaan   va
SFX W   0     llesiko     va
SFX W   0     llesipa     va
SFX W   0     llesihan    va
SFX W   0     llesikinko  va
SFX W   0     llesikaanko va
SFX W   0     llesikohan  va
SFX W   0     llesipahan  va
SFX W   0     llensakin   va
SFX W   0     llensakaan  va
SFX W   0     llensako    va
SFX W   0     llensapa    va
SFX W   0     llensahan   va
SFX W   0     llensakinko va
SFX W   0     llensakaanko va
SFX W   0     llensakohan va
SFX W   0     llensapahan va
SFX W   0     llemmekin   va
SFX W   0     llemmekaan  va
SFX W   0     llemmeko    va
SFX W   0     llemmepa    va
SFX W   0     llemmehan   va
SFX W   0     llemmekinko va
SFX W   0     llemmekaanko va
SFX W   0     llemmekohan va
SFX W   0     llemmepahan va
SFX W   0     llennekin   va
SFX W   0     llennekaan  va
SFX W   0     llenneko    va
SFX W   0     llennepa    va
SFX W   0     llennehan   va
SFX W   0     llennekinko va
SFX W   0     llennekaanko va
SFX W   0     llennekohan va
SFX W   0     llennepahan va
SFX W   0     ksenikin    va
SFX W   0     ksenikaan   va
SFX W   0     kseniko     va
SFX W   0     ksenipa     va
SFX W   0     ksenihan    va
SFX W   0     ksenikinko  va
SFX W   0     ksenikaanko va
SFX W   0     ksenikohan  va
SFX W   0     ksenipahan  va
SFX W   0     ksesikin    va
SFX W   0     ksesikaan   va
SFX W   0     ksesiko     va
SFX W   0     ksesipa     va
SFX W   0     ksesihan    va
SFX W   0     ksesikinko  va
SFX W   0     ksesikaanko va
SFX W   0     ksesikohan  va
SFX W   0     ksesipahan  va
SFX W   0     ksensakin   va
SFX W   0     ksensakaan  va
SFX W   0     ksensako    va
SFX W   0     ksensapa    va
SFX W   0     ksensahan   va
SFX W   0     ksensakinko va
SFX W   0     ksensakaanko va
SFX W   0     ksensakohan va
SFX W   0     ksensapahan va
SFX W   0     ksemmekin   va
SFX W   0     ksemmekaan  va
SFX W   0     ksemmeko    va
SFX W   0     ksemmepa    va
SFX W   0     ksemmehan   va
SFX W   0     ksemmekinko va
SFX W   0     ksemmekaanko va
SFX W   0     ksemmekohan va
SFX W   0     ksemmepahan va
SFX W   0     ksennekin   va
SFX W   0     ksennekaan  va
SFX W   0     ksenneko    va
SFX W   0     ksennepa    va
SFX W   0     ksennehan   va
SFX W   0     ksennekinko va
SFX W   0     ksennekaanko va
SFX W   0     ksennekohan va
SFX W   0     ksennepahan va
SFX W   0     nanikin     va
SFX W   0     nanikaan    va
SFX W   0     naniko      va
SFX W   0     nanipa      va
SFX W   0     nanihan     va
SFX W   0     nanikinko   va
SFX W   0     nanikaanko  va
SFX W   0     nanikohan   va
SFX W   0     nanipahan   va
SFX W   0     nasikin     va
SFX W   0     nasikaan    va
SFX W   0     nasiko      va
SFX W   0     nasipa      va
SFX W   0     nasihan     va
SFX W   0     nasikinko   va
SFX W   0     nasikaanko  va
SFX W   0     nasikohan   va
SFX W   0     nasipahan   va
SFX W   0     nansakin    va
SFX W   0     nansakaan   va
SFX W   0     nansako     va
SFX W   0     nansapa     va
SFX W   0     nansahan    va
SFX W   0     nansakinko  va
SFX W   0     nansakaanko va
SFX W   0     nansakohan  va
SFX W   0     nansapahan  va
SFX W   0     nammekin    va
SFX W   0     nammekaan   va
SFX W   0     nammeko     va
SFX W   0     nammepa     va
SFX W   0     nammehan    va
SFX W   0     nammekinko  va
SFX W   0     nammekaanko va
SFX W   0     nammekohan  va
SFX W   0     nammepahan  va
SFX W   0     nannekin    va
SFX W   0     nannekaan   va
SFX W   0     nanneko     va
SFX W   0     nannepa     va
SFX W   0     nannehan    va
SFX W   0     nannekinko  va
SFX W   0     nannekaanko va
SFX W   0     nannekohan  va
SFX W   0     nannepahan  va
SFX W   a     issanikin   va
SFX W   a     issanikaan  va
SFX W   a     issaniko    va
SFX W   a     issanipa    va
SFX W   a     issanihan   va
SFX W   a     issanikinko va
SFX W   a     issanikaanko va
SFX W   a     issanikohan va
SFX W   a     issanipahan va
SFX W   a     issasikin   va
SFX W   a     issasikaan  va
SFX W   a     issasiko    va
SFX W   a     issasipa    va
SFX W   a     issasihan   va
SFX W   a     issasikinko va
SFX W   a     issasikaanko va
SFX W   a     issasikohan va
SFX W   a     issasipahan va
SFX W   a     issansakin  va
SFX W   a     issansakaan va
SFX W   a     issansako   va
SFX W   a     issansapa   va
SFX W   a     issansahan  va
SFX W   a     issansakinko va
SFX W   a     issansakaanko va
SFX W   a     issansakohan va
SFX W   a     issansapahan va
SFX W   a     issammekin  va
SFX W   a     issammekaan va
SFX W   a     issammeko   va
SFX W   a     issammepa   va
SFX W   a     issammehan  va
SFX W   a     issammekinko va
SFX W   a     issammekaanko va
SFX W   a     issammekohan va
SFX W   a     issammepahan va
SFX W   a     issannekin  va
SFX W   a     issannekaan va
SFX W   a     issanneko   va
SFX W   a     issannepa   va
SFX W   a     issannehan  va
SFX W   a     issannekinko va
SFX W   a     issannekaanko va
SFX W   a     issannekohan va
SFX W   a     issannepahan va
SFX W   a     istanikin   va
SFX W   a     istanikaan  va
SFX W   a     istaniko    va
SFX W   a     istanipa    va
